Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1210
Licensee; bank account; separate; books and records.

A licensee shall maintain a separate bank account for the benefit of debtors in which all payments received from debtors for the benefit of creditors shall be deposited and in which all payments shall remain until a remittance is made to either the debtor, creditor, or the licensee for fees. Every licensee shall keep, and use in his business, books, accounts and records which will enable the secretary to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 and with the rules and regulations of the secretary. Every licensee shall preserve such books, accounts and records for at least five years after making the final entry on any transaction recorded therein.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 10, p. 1183.